Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1003
Basic workweek; staggering of hours.

To effectuate the purposes of sections 84-1001 and 84-1002, any state officer or the head of a department or institution may stagger the hours and days of work of the employees supervised by him except where the salary is set as provided by law.

Laws 1957, c. 398, § 3, p. 1364.